Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.011

Settlement without court intervention—Petition—Conditions—Exceptions.

(1) A personal representative may petition the court for nonintervention powers, whether the decedent died testate or intestate.

(2) Unless the decedent has specified in the decedent's will, if any, that the court not grant nonintervention powers to the personal representative, the court shall grant nonintervention powers to a personal representative who petitions for the powers if the court determines that the decedent's estate is solvent, taking into account probate and nonprobate assets, and that:

(a) The petitioning personal representative was named in the decedent's probated will as the personal representative;

(b) The decedent died intestate, the petitioning personal representative is the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, the decedent's estate is composed of community property only, and the decedent had no issue: (i) Who is living or in gestation on the date of the petition; (ii) whose identity is reasonably ascertainable on the date of the petition; and (iii) who is not also the issue of the petitioning spouse or petitioning domestic partner; or

(c) The personal representative was not a creditor of the decedent at the time of the decedent's death and the administration and settlement of the decedent's will or estate with nonintervention powers would be in the best interests of the decedent's beneficiaries and creditors. However, the administration and settlement of the decedent's will or estate with nonintervention powers will be presumed to be in the beneficiaries' and creditors' best interest until a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.68.041 rebuts that presumption by coming forward with evidence that the grant of nonintervention powers would not be in the beneficiaries' or creditors' best interests.

(3) The court may base its findings of facts necessary for the grant of nonintervention powers on: (a) Statements of witnesses appearing before the court; (b) representations contained in a verified petition for nonintervention powers, in an inventory made and returned upon oath into the court, or in an affidavit filed with the court; or (c) other proof submitted to the court.

[ 2008 c 6 s 925; 1997 c 252 s 59.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.